src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-II-miskwâw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - miskwâw :

      # Core 

      # Prs+Ind
      miskwâw+V+II+Ind+3Sg: miskwâw   # it is red

      # Prs+Cnj
      PV/î+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: î-miskwâk   # as it is red
      

      # Prs # Ind
      miskwâw+V+II+Ind+3Sg: miskwâw   # it is red
      miskwâw+V+II+Ind+4Sg: miskwâthiw   # it over there is red
      miskwâw+V+II+Ind+3Pl: miskwâwa   # they are red
      miskwâw+V+II+Ind+4Pl: miskwâthiwa   # they over there are red
      

      # Prs # Cnj
      PV/î+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: î-miskwâk   # as it is red
      PV/î+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: î-miskwâthik   # as it over there is red
      PV/î+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: î-miskwâki   # as they are red
      PV/î+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Pl+Var/East: [î-miskwâkwâ, î-miskwâkiht, î-miskwâhki]   # as they are red
      PV/î+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: î-miskwâthiki   # as they over there are red
      PV/î+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Pl+Var/East: î-miskwâthikwâ   # as they over there are red
      

      # Prt # Ind
      PV/ki+miskwâw+V+II+Ind+3Sg: kî-miskwâw   # it was red
      PV/ki+miskwâw+V+II+Ind+4Sg: kî-miskwâthiw   # it over there was red
      PV/ki+miskwâw+V+II+Ind+3Pl: kî-miskwâwa   # they were red
      PV/ki+miskwâw+V+II+Ind+4Pl: kî-miskwâthiwa   # they over there were red
      

      # Prt # Cnj
      PV/î+PV/ki+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: î-kî-miskwâk   # as it was red
      PV/î+PV/ki+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: î-kî-miskwâthik   # as it over there was red
      PV/î+PV/ki+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: î-kî-miskwâki   # as they were red
      PV/î+PV/ki+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Pl+Var/East: [î-kî-miskwâkwâ, î-kî-miskwâkiht, î-kî-miskwâhki]   # as they were red
      PV/î+PV/ki+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: î-kî-miskwâthiki   # as they over there were red
      PV/î+PV/ki+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Pl+Var/East: î-kî-miskwâthikwâ   # as they over there were red
      

      # Fut+Int # Ind
      PV/wi+miskwâw+V+II+Ind+3Sg: wî-miskwâw   # it is going to be red
      PV/wi+miskwâw+V+II+Ind+4Sg: wî-miskwâthiw   # it over there is going to be red
      PV/wi+miskwâw+V+II+Ind+3Pl: wî-miskwâwa   # they are going to be red
      PV/wi+miskwâw+V+II+Ind+4Pl: wî-miskwâthiwa   # they over there are going to be red
      

      # Fut+Int # Cnj
      PV/î+PV/wi+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: î-wî-miskwâk   # as it is going to be red
      PV/î+PV/wi+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: î-wî-miskwâthik   # as it over there is going to be red
      PV/î+PV/wi+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: î-wî-miskwâki   # as they are going to be red
      PV/î+PV/wi+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Pl+Var/East: [î-wî-miskwâkwâ, î-wî-miskwâkiht, î-wî-miskwâhki]   # as they are going to be red
      PV/î+PV/wi+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: î-wî-miskwâthiki   # as they over there are going to be red
      PV/î+PV/wi+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Pl+Var/East: î-wî-miskwâthikwâ   # as they over there are going to be red
      

      # Fut+Def # Ind
      PV/ka+miskwâw+V+II+Ind+3Sg: ka-miskwâw   # it will be red
      PV/ka+miskwâw+V+II+Ind+4Sg: ka-miskwâthiw   # it over there will be red
      PV/ka+miskwâw+V+II+Ind+3Pl: ka-miskwâwa   # they will be red
      PV/ka+miskwâw+V+II+Ind+4Pl: ka-miskwâthiwa   # they over there will be red
      

      # Inf # PV/ka
      PV/ka+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: ka-miskwâk   # it will be red
      PV/ka+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: ka-miskwâthik   # it over there will be red
      PV/ka+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: ka-miskwâki   # they will be red
      PV/ka+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Pl+Var/East: [ka-miskwâkwâ, ka-miskwâkiht, ka-miskwâhki]   # they will be red
      PV/ka+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: ka-miskwâthiki   # they over there will be red
      PV/ka+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Pl+Var/East: ka-miskwâthikwâ   # they over there will be red
      

      # Inf # PV/ta
      PV/ta+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: ta-miskwâk   # it is red
      PV/ta+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: ta-miskwâthik   # it over there is red
      PV/ta+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: ta-miskwâki   # they are red
      PV/ta+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Pl+Var/East: [ta-miskwâkwâ, ta-miskwâkiht, ta-miskwâhki]   # they are red
      PV/ta+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: ta-miskwâthiki   # they over there are red
      PV/ta+miskwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Pl+Var/East: ta-miskwâthikwâ   # they over there are red
      

      # Fut # Cond
      miskwâw+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Sg: miskwâki   # when it is red
      miskwâw+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Sg: miskwâthiki   # when it over there is red
      miskwâw+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Pl: miskwâkwâwi   # when they are red
      miskwâw+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Pl: miskwâthikwâwi   # when they over there are red
      
